vi: Viên nén: Độ chính xác cao; Đấu giải; Không mối nối; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
nb: Kulekvalitet: Høy presisjon; Match; Sømløs; Standard; Annet
el: Ποιότητας σφαιριδίων: Υψηλής ακρίβειας; Σκοποβολής (match); Χωρίς ραφές; Τυπικό; Άλλο
de: Pelletqualität: Hochpräzise; Match; Nahtlos; Standard; Sonstige
pt-PT: Pellets: Alta precisão; Competição; Sem costuras; Padrão; Outro
sv: Pelletskvalitet: Hög precision; Match; Sömlös; Standard; Övrigt
bg-BG: Вид пелети: Висока прецизност; За състезания; Безшевни; Стандартен; Друг
es: Clase de municiones: Alta precisión; Competición; Sin costuras; Estándar; Otro
ja: ペレットグレード: 高精度; マッチ; シームレス; スタンダード; その他
en: Pellet grade: High precision; Match; Seamless; Standard; Other
zh-CN: 弹丸等级: 高精度; 比赛级; 无缝; 标准; 其他
tr: Pelet kalitesi: Yüksek hassasiyet; Müsabaka; Eksiz; Standart; Diğer
it: Grado dei pallini: Alta precisione; Da gara; Senza saldature; Standard; Altro
th: เกรดเม็ด: ความแม่นยำสูง; เกรดแข่งขัน; ไร้รอยต่อ; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 彈丸等級: 高精度; 比賽級; 無縫; 標準; 其他
ro-RO: Gradul bilelor de airsoft: Înaltă precizie; Competiție; Fără îmbinare; Standard; Altele
fi: Kuulien laatu: Korkea tarkkuus; Kilpataso; Saumaton; Vakio; Muu
cs: Druh kuliček: Vysoká přesnost; Závodní; Bezešvé; Standardní; Ostatní
sk-SK: Trieda brokov: Vysoká presnosť; Zápasové; Bezšvové; Štandardné; Iné
sl-SI: Razred kroglic: Visoka natančnost; Tekmovalni (Match); Brezšivni; Standardni; Drugo
nl: Pellet kwaliteit: Hoge precisie; Match; Naadloos; Standaard; Overig
hr-HR: Ocjena kuglica: Visoka preciznost; Match; Bešavna; Standardna; Ostalo
pt-BR: Pellet grau: Alta precisão; Competição (Match); Sem costura; Padrão; Outro
da: Kuglekvalitet: Høj præcision; Match; Sømløs; Standard; Andet
fr: Grade des billes d’airsoft: Haute précision; Compétition; Sans soudure; Standard; Autre
lt-LT: Šratukų klasė: Didelio tikslumo; Varžybinis; Besiūlis; Standartinis; Kita
ru: Класс пеллет: Высокая точность; Матчевые; Бесшовные; Стандартные; Другое
hu: Lövedékminőség: Nagy pontosságú; Verseny; Varratmentes; Standard; Egyéb
pl: Klasa pelletu: Wysoka precyzja; Match; Bezszwowy; Standardowy; Inne
ko: 펠릿 등급: 고정밀도; 매치; 심리스; 표준; 기타